Idaho statutes. TITLE 34 ELECTIONS
CHAPTER 24
VOTING BY MACHINE OR VOTE TALLY SYSTEM

Section.

34-2401. Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

“Ballot” means any material used or the voting surface of a direct recording electronic system on which votes are cast for offices, candidates and measures.

“Ballot card” means the tabulating card or cards of any size upon which the voter records his vote.

“Ballot label” means the cards, papers, booklet or other material containing the names of offices and candidates and measures to be voted on.

“Election” means all state, county, city, district and other political subdivision elections including bond issue elections.

“Governing body” means the board of county commissioners of any county or the governing body of any city, district or other political subdivision elections including bond issue elections.

“Measure” means a proposed law, act or part of an act of the legislative assembly or amendment to the constitution of the state of Idaho to be submitted to the people for their approval or rejection at an election. “Measure” also means other propositions which can be submitted to the voters at any election by counties, cities, districts or other political subdivisions.

“Model” means a mechanically operated model of a portion of the face of the machine illustrating the means of voting.

“Precinct” includes all election districts.

“Voting machine” means:

Any mechanical or electronic device which will record every vote cast by any voter on candidates and measures and which will either internally or externally total all votes cast on that device;

Any device into which a ballot card may be inserted and which is so designed and constructed that the vote for any candidate or measure may be indicated by punching or marking the ballot card.

“Vote tally system” means one (1) or more pieces of machinery or equipment necessary to examine and tally automatically paper ballots having marks placed thereon by a written mark or by a marking stamp. The examination shall be accomplished by either mark sensing or optical scanning.

34-2402. Authority to use.

It is the policy of this state that at all elections, including bond issue elections, that ballots or votes may be cast, registered, recorded and counted by means of voting machines or vote tally systems as provided in this chapter.

34-2403. Applicability of other laws.

All election laws, including, but not limited to, bond election laws, city charters or ordinances, not inconsistent with this chapter, shall apply to all elections in election precincts where voting machines or vote tally systems are used. No provision of law, city charter or ordinance which in any way conflicts with this chapter or with the use of voting machines or vote tally systems as provided in this chapter, shall operate to prohibit use of voting machines or vote tally systems in any election or bond issue election.

34-2404. Tampering with machines prohibited.

No person shall:

Tamper with or injure or attempt to injure any voting machine or vote tally system to be used or being used in an election.

Tamper with any voting machine or vote tally system that has been used in an election.

Prevent or attempt to prevent the correct operation of any voting machine or vote tally system.

An unauthorized person shall not make or have in his possession a key to a voting machine to be used or being used in an election.

Neither the secretary of state nor any officer or employee of any county, city, district or other political subdivision using voting machines or vote tally systems, shall solicit or accept any compensation, other than amounts paid by the governmental unit, in connection with the sale, lease or use of voting machines or vote tally systems.

34-2405. Authority for procurement of machines.

After consultation with the county clerk as chief elections officer of his county, the governing body at any regular meeting or a special meeting called for the purpose, may rent, purchase or otherwise procure, and provide for the use of, in all or a portion of the election precincts of the county, any voting machine or vote tally system which the governing body deems to be in the best interest of that county and which machine or system is approved by the secretary of state.

Thereafter the voting machine or vote tally system shall be used for voting and for receiving, registering and counting the votes in all primary and general elections held in such precincts.

In all other elections, the voting machine or vote tally system may be used for voting, receiving, registering and counting the votes at the direction of the county clerk.

34-2406. Joint purchase and use of machines authorized.

In procuring the necessary voting machines or vote tally systems to be used, a governing body of any county, city, district or other political subdivision in the county, may by agreement entered into by the board of county commissioners and the governing bodies of cities, districts or other political subdivisions, provide for the joint purchase and subsequent ownership of voting machines or vote tally systems and for the care, maintenance and use of the machines or vote tally systems.

The governing body of two (2) or more counties may by agreement provide for the joint use of voting machines or vote tally systems.

34-2407. Purchase of machines — Manner of payment.

The governing body may, on the adoption and purchase of voting machines or vote tally systems, provide for their payment in the method it determines to be for the best interest of the county, city, district or other political subdivision. The governing body may make contracts for the purchase of the machines or vote tally systems with such provisions with regard to price, manner of purchase and time of payment that the governing body determines are proper.

For the purpose of paying for voting machines or vote tally systems, the governing body may:

Issue bonds, warrants, notes or other negotiable obligations. The bonds, warrants, certificates, notes or other obligations shall be a charge upon the county, city, district or other political subdivisions.

Pay for the voting machines or vote tally system in cash out of the general fund.

Provide for the payment for the voting machines or vote tally systems by other means.

In estimating the amount of taxes for the general fund, if any, the amount required for payment for voting machines or vote tally systems shall be added, extending over the time required to pay for the machines or vote tally systems.

34-2408. Prior approval required for issuance of bonds.

The governing body of any county shall, prior to authorizing the issuance of bonds obtain the approval in writing of the secretary of state as to the type and number of machines or vote tally systems to be purchased and the price to be paid therefor.

34-2409. Examination of machines by secretary of state prior to adoption.

The secretary of state shall publicly examine all makes of voting machines or vote tally systems submitted to him and determine whether the machines or vote tally systems comply with the requirements of this chapter, and can safely be used by voters at elections under the provisions of this chapter. Any voting machine or vote tally system shall be certified by the secretary of state for use in Idaho. Except for functions or capabilities unique to this state, voting machines and vote tally systems shall be tested and the results certified by an independent testing authority designated by the secretary of state prior to certification.

Any person owning or interested in a voting machine or vote tally system may submit it to the secretary of state for examination. No examination shall be conducted unless documentation is provided indicating that the voting machine or vote tally system meets the federal election commission standards. For the purpose of assistance in examining the machine or vote tally system the secretary of state may employ not more than three (3) individuals who are expert in one (1) or more of the fields of data processing, mechanical engineering and public administration. The compensation of these assistants shall be paid by the person submitting the machine or vote tally system.

Within thirty (30) days after completing the examination and approval of any voting machine or vote tally system the secretary of state shall make and file in his office his report on the machine or vote tally system, together with a written or printed description and drawings and photographs clearly identifying the machine or vote tally system and the operation thereof. As soon as practicable after such filing, the secretary of state upon request shall send a copy of the report to any governing body within the state.

Any voting machine or vote tally system that receives the approval of the secretary of state may be used for conducting elections in this state. Any machine or vote tally system that does not receive such approval shall not be adopted for or used at any election. After a voting machine or vote tally system has been approved by the secretary of state, any change or improvement in the machine or vote tally system that does not impair its accuracy, efficiency or capacity shall not render necessary a reexamination or reapproval of the machine or vote tally system.

Any voting system, including paper ballots, that was used in the 2004 general election shall be continued to be authorized for use as long as the voting system meets the requirements of the “Help America Vote Act of 2002,” Public Law 107-252.

For all elections conducted after 2004, no direct recording electronic voting device shall be used unless the direct recording electronic voting device has a voter verifiable paper audit trail. Any certifications of a direct recording electronic voting device without a voter verifiable paper audit trail are hereby declared null and void.

34-2410. Specifications for voting machines or vote tally systems.

No voting machine or vote tally system shall be approved by the secretary of state unless it is constructed so that it:

Secures to the voter secrecy in the act of voting.

Provides facilities for voting for the candidates of as many political parties or organizations as may make nominations and for or against as many measures as may be submitted.

Permits the voter to vote for any person for any office and upon any measure that he has the right to vote for.

Permits the voter, except at primary elections, to vote for all the candidates of one (1) party or in part for the candidates of one (1) party and in part for the candidates of one or more other parties.

Permits the voter to vote for as many persons for an office as he is lawfully entitled to vote for but no more.

Prevents the voter from voting for the same person more than once for the same office.

Correctly registers or records all votes cast for any and all persons and for or against any and all measures.

Can be adjusted so that the counting mechanism rejects any vote cast on the tabulating card in excess of the number which the voter is entitled to vote.

Provides that a vote for more than one (1) candidate cannot be cast by one (1) single operation of the machine or vote tally system.

A vote tally system shall be:

Capable of correctly counting votes on ballots or ballot cards on which the proper number of votes have been marked for any office or question or issue that has been voted.

Capable of ignoring the votes marked for any office or question or issue where more than the allowable number of votes have been marked, but shall correctly count the properly voted portions of the ballot card.

Capable of accumulating a count of the specific number of ballots or ballot cards tallied for a precinct, accumulating total votes by a candidate for each office; and accumulating total votes for and against each question and issue of the ballots or ballot cards tallied for a precinct.

Capable of tallying votes from ballots or ballot cards of different political parties, from the same precinct, in the case of a primary election.

Capable of accommodating rotation of candidates’ names on the ballot or ballot card, provided that all ballots or ballot cards from one (1) precinct shall be of the same rotation sequence.

Capable of automatically producing precinct totals in either printed, marked, or punched form, or combinations thereof.

34-2411. Duties of clerks of election boards.

The secretary of state shall issue an administrative order outlining the duties of each of the clerks on the election board. He shall devise and prescribe for use by each local election officer the contents, form, character and kinds of ballots, ballot labels, ballot cards, formats, records, papers and documents and other materials and supplies and procedures necessary in the use of voting machines or vote tally systems and in the process of counting and tabulating the ballots by mechanical or electrical counting devices or equipment or computers.

The secretary of state shall prescribe rules and regulations to achieve and maintain the maximum degree of correctness, impartiality and efficiency on the procedures of voting, and of counting, tabulating and recording votes, by the devices, machines or vote tally systems and methods provided by this act.

34-2412. Composition of precinct election boards.

The election board of each election precinct in which a voting machine or vote tally system is used shall consist of an election judge and one (1) or more clerks. Each election board shall contain personnel representing all existing political parties if a list of applicants has been provided to the county clerk by the precinct committeemen of the precincts at least sixty (60) days prior to the primary election. The county clerk shall establish the number of election board clerks.

The qualifications and duties of election judges shall apply to the appointment of election board clerks in counties or precincts where voting machines or vote tally systems are used.

34-2413. Preparation of machines for use — Instructions.

Before each election at which voting machines or vote tally systems are to be used, the county clerk of a county, in which voting machines or vote tally systems are to be used, shall cause them to be properly prepared and shall cause the election board to be properly instructed in their use.

For the purpose of giving such instruction, the county clerk shall call the meeting or meetings of the election board that are necessary. Each election board shall attend the meetings and receive the instruction necessary for the proper conduct of the election with the machine or vote tally system.

No election board judge or clerk shall serve in any election at which a voting machine or vote tally system is used unless he has received the required instruction and is fully qualified to perform the duties in connection with the machine or vote tally system; but this requirement shall not prevent the appointment of an election board clerk to fill a vacancy in an emergency.

34-2414. Printed matter and supplies.

The election officer charged with the duty of providing ballots shall provide all necessary instruction, forms and supplies required for the proper use of the voting machines or vote tally systems.

Within a proper and reasonable time before the first election at which voting machines or vote tally systems are to be used, the secretary of state shall prepare samples of the printed matter and supplies required. He shall furnish one (1) of each of the samples to the election officer in charge of the election of each county, city, district or other political subdivision in which the machines or vote tally systems are to be used.

The county clerk or other election officer shall deliver voting machines to each election board as provided for election supplies.

34-2415. Preparation of polling place for election.

The election board of each election precinct in which a voting machine is to be used shall meet at the polling place for the election precinct at least thirty (30) minutes before the time set for opening the polls. Before preparing the machine for voting, the election board shall proceed as prescribed in subsection (2) of this section.

The election board shall:

Cause the voting machine to be placed where it can be conveniently attended by the election board and conveniently operated by the voters and where the ballot labels on the machines can be plainly seen by the election board and the public when not being voted on.

Cause the model to be placed where each voter can conveniently operate it and receive instructions on the model as to the manner of voting before entering the voting machine booth.

Determine that the ballot labels are in the proper place on the machine.

After performing their duties as provided in this section, the election board shall certify to the fact in the appropriate places in the poll book.

34-2416. Procedure for preparing machines for an election.

In preparing a voting machine for an election, the county clerk or the clerk of the city, district or other political subdivision, as the case may be, shall:

Arrange the machine and the ballot labels so that it shall in every particular case meet the requirements of voting and counting at such elections.

Thoroughly inspect and test the machine, and file a certificate in his office that the ballot labels have been properly arranged.

The arrangement of offices and names of candidates upon the ballot labels shall conform as nearly as practicable to the provisions of law for the arrangement of names on paper ballots, and in the event that there are more candidates for any office than can be placed upon one (1) page, the labels shall be clearly marked to indicate that the names of candidates for the office are continued on the following page.

Representatives of political parties and candidates shall be permitted to examine the voting machines or vote tally systems.

34-2417. Notice of locations of voting machines and polling places.

Before preparing the voting machines or vote tally systems for any election, the county clerk shall mail to the chairman of the county or legislative district central committees of each political party who has notified such clerk that notice is desired, a written notice stating the time and place or places where voting machines or vote tally systems will be prepared for the election. At such times and places, one (1) representative of each political party is entitled to be present and see that the machines or vote tally systems are properly prepared and placed in proper condition and order for use at the election. In nonpartisan elections each candidate may designate one (1) representative who has the same powers as the political party representatives. The political party and candidate representatives shall certify that they have witnessed the testing and preparation of the machines or vote tally systems. The certificates shall be filed in the office of the county clerk.

34-2418. Ballots and ballot labels.

The ballots and ballot labels required to be furnished for general or special elections shall be printed in black ink on clear white material of such size and arrangements as to suit the construction of the machine. The ballot labels for measures may contain a condensed statement of purpose for each measure to be voted on, accompanied by the words “Yes” and “No.” The title of the offices on the ballot labels shall be printed in type as large as the space for the office will reasonably permit. Where more than one (1) candidate can be voted for an office, there shall be printed below the office title words indicating the number the voter is lawfully entitled to vote for out of the whole number of candidates, such as “Vote for Two.”

The ballots and ballot labels required to be furnished for primary elections may be of different colors for the political parties who are nominating or electing candidates.

The “judiciary ballot” may be added to the ballot labels for the political parties. Candidates for the above offices will be shown under the general title of nonpartisan judicial candidates.

When a vote tally system is used, the county clerk shall prepare the ballots as nearly as practicable as required by law.

34-2419. Rotation of names of candidates.

In each primary and general election when two (2) or more persons are candidates for nomination or election to the same office, the county clerk or the clerk of a city, district or other municipality in which voting machines or vote tally systems are used shall rotate the names of candidates as directed by the secretary of state.

34-2420. Examinations of face of machine during election.

The election board shall occasionally examine the face of the voting machine and the ballot labels to determine that the machine and the ballot labels have not been damaged or tampered with.

34-2421. Procedure if a voting machine becomes inoperative.

If any voting machine used in any election precinct, during or before the time the polls are opened, becomes damaged so as to render it inoperative in whole or in part, an election board clerk immediately shall notify the election officer charged with the care of the machine.

If possible, the election officer so notified shall repair the machine at once or substitute another machine for the damaged machine.

If no other machine can be procured for use at the election and the damaged machine cannot be repaired in time for further use at the election, or where in the discretion of a majority of the members of the election board it is impracticable to use the machine, the election board shall permit the voters to use paper ballots prepared as in cases where paper ballots are used. The paper ballots shall be furnished to the election board by the county clerk. The paper ballots shall be issued, voted and deposited in ballot boxes in as nearly the same manner as provided by law, except that the paper ballots shall not be tallied and returned by the election board. Instead, these paper ballots shall be delivered to the county clerk for his tally and canvass.

34-2422. Closing of polls — Delivery of ballots to clerk before polls closed.

At the hour for closing the polls, the election board shall declare the polls of the election closed and shall not permit any further voting. However, electors who are, at the hour of closing, within the polling room or awaiting their turn to vote shall be considered as having begun the act of voting and shall be permitted to cast their votes.

At any time prior to the closing of the polls provision may be made for the delivery of voted ballots to the county clerk or the clerk of a city, district or other political subdivision for counting. If such procedure is adopted, the result of this early count shall not be released to the public until after 8:00 p.m. of election day.

34-2423. Absent voting by voting machine or paper ballot.

The county clerk may provide that absent voting shall be either by voting machine or by marking a paper ballot or a combination of both. In any of the foregoing cases he may establish one (1) absent elector unit to handle and process absent elector ballots for each legislative district within his county and shall cause sufficient ballots of the proper kind or kinds to be provided.

Voted ballots shall be retained by the county clerk until election day when they shall be transferred to the ballot processing center and thereafter made a part of the election returns.

34-2424. Paper ballots used in conjunction with voting machines.

In any election where voting machines or vote tally systems are used:

Paper ballots may be used to record the electors’ votes for party offices.

Paper ballots may be used to record the electors’ votes for or against municipal candidates or measures.

Paper ballots which are used in conjunction with voting machines may be returned to the office of the county clerk for counting by special counting boards. Ballots so counted shall be tallied and returned by precinct or polling location for elections conducted pursuant to chapter 14, title 34, Idaho Code.

Ballots or ballot cards may be returned to the office of the county clerk for counting.

In the event that paper ballots are used in conjunction with voting machines or vote tally systems to record write-in votes, these paper ballots may be returned to the office of the county clerk for counting by special counting boards. Ballots so counted shall be tallied and returned by precinct or polling location for elections conducted pursuant to chapter 14, title 34, Idaho Code.

34-2425. Preparation and distribution of sample ballots.

At each primary, general and special election there shall be provided as many sample ballots as the county clerk considers necessary. The sample ballots shall be prepared and distributed as provided by law.

For each primary, general and special election the county clerk shall cause to be published a facsimile, except as to size, of the sample ballot required in subsection (1) of this section.

34-2426. Exhibition of voting machines for instruction of voters.

Before each election at which voting machines are to be used the county clerk shall place on public exhibition a suitable number of machines for the proper instruction of voters. The machines shall be arranged and equipped with ballot labels so as to best illustrate the method of voting at that election and so far as practicable, shall contain:

The names of the offices to be filled.

The names of the candidates to be voted for, together with their proper party designations in case of party elections.

Statements of the measure to be voted on.

In addition to supplying sample ballots, the county clerk shall, before the election, take reasonable additional steps to familiarize the voters with a diagram showing the face of the voting machine after the official ballot labels are arranged thereon with illustrated instructions how to vote, and with the locations of the voting machines that are on public exhibition.

Before each election at which a vote tally system is to be used, the county clerk shall make every reasonable effort to acquaint the electors within his county with the ballot format and the marking system.

34-2427. Voters with physical or other disability.

The election board clerks shall instruct electors on how to record their votes on the voting machine or vote tally system, and shall give assistance to any elector who declares that he is unable by reason of physical or other disability to record his vote on the machine or vote tally system, and on request by the elector after he has entered the voting booth, shall give him the necessary information to enable him to record his vote.

Any elector who, because of blindness, physical or other disability, is unable to mark his ballot shall, upon request, receive the assistance of the election board clerks or some other person chosen by the elector in the marking thereof. Such clerks or person shall ascertain the wishes of the elector and mark his ballot in accordance therewith, and shall thereafter give no information regarding such marking. Whenever an elector receives assistance in this manner, a clerk shall make a notation thereof in the combination election record and poll book following the name of the elector.

If any elector, after entering the voting booth, asks for information regarding the operation of the voting machine or marking device, the election board clerks shall give him the necessary information.

34-2428. Time allowed each voter to vote. [Repealed.]

34-2429. Validation of elections.

All elections, including but not limited to bond issue elections, heretofore conducted pursuant to this chapter and all proceedings had or to be had in the authorization and issuance of the bonds authorized thereat, together with all such bonds when issued, are hereby validated, ratified and confirmed, and all such bonds when issued are declared to constitute legally binding obligations in accordance with their terms. Nothing in this section shall be construed to affect or validate any bond election, or bonds issued pursuant thereto, the legality of which are being contested at the time this act takes effect.

34-2430. Rental agreements. [Repealed.]